src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ====================== !
! Bokmål noun morphology !
! ====================== !

! Declension classes
! Main types, from Bokmålsordboka

! f1  bru         brua        bruer       bruene
! f2  pumpe       pumpa       pumper      pumpene
! m1  stol        stolen      stoler      stolene
!     bakke       bakken      bakker      bakkene
!     pumpe       pumpen      pumper      pumpene
! m2  lærer       læreren     lærere      lærerne
! m3  bever       beveren     bevere      beverne
!                             bevre(r)    bevrene
! m4 longs longsen longs/longser longsene
! n1  slott       slottet     slott       slotta/slottene
! n2  eple        eplet       epler       epla/eplene
!     salt        saltet      salter      salta/saltene
! n3  kontor      kontoret    kontor      kontora
!                             kontorer    kontorene
!     høve        høvet       høve/høver  høva/høvene
! n4  salt        saltet      salter      salta/saltene ??
! n5  middel      midlet      midler      midla/midlene ??

! Subtypes, mainly from Finsk-norsk ordbok, also system-specific

! x  unclassified, to m1 by default
! mX indecl
! m1sg sg only
! m1pl pl only
! m1b dam
! m1b fe, komite
! m1V sko pl. sko
! m3V meter pl. meter
! ma alliert, alierte, allierte, allierte
! KOLLEGA kollegaer, kolleger
! KONTO kontoer, konti
! RADIUS radiuser, radii
! BROR brødre
! FAR fedre
! MANN menn

! mD gårde, garde, dage  (av gårde)
! fD tide (i tide)
! nD live (i live)

! DATTER døtre
! f1b skam
! f1X bok pl. bøker
! f1V mus, pl. mus
! fGLO glo, pl glør

! n1b rom pl. rom
! n1s sg only
! n2b program pl. programmer
! n2c kontor pl. kontor, kontorer
! n2s mørke, not pl.
! n3b lager def. lageret
! n3c fe, feet
! n4b faktum pl fakta
! FORUM forum, forumet, fora/forumer, foraene/forumene
! LEKSIKON leksikon, pl. leksika
! MUSEUM museum, museet, museer



! Basic paradigms
! ===============

LEXICON mD
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
LEXICON fD
+N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
LEXICON nD
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: # ;


LEXICON n1n3
  n1 ;
  n3 ;

LEXICON m1n1
  m1 ;
  n1 ;

!LEXICON m1n1f1
!  m1 ;
!  f1 ;
!  n1 ;

LEXICON m1Vn1
  m1V ;
  n1  ;


! Masc2ulines
! ----------

LEXICON x
!  +X: m1 ; !Temporarily excluding the xX
       m1 ; ! change line back if needed.

LEXICON mX
 +N+Msc+Sg+Indef: K ;
     +N: R ;

!LEXICON mD ! av garde
! +N+Msc+Dat: K ;


LEXICON m4
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef: K ; ! flere stillongs
m1 ;

LEXICON m1 ! dag, hane
 +N: R       ;
     m1morph ;

LEXICON m1-e- ! stut, stuteplage
 +N: Re      ;
     m1morph ;

LEXICON m1morph
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: ar-ane ;

LEXICON m1sg ! bruk
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON m1pl ! gamledager
 +N+Msc+Pl: r-ne ;

LEXICON m1X
         +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:Z1 ar-ane ;
                +N:   R      ;

LEXICON m1b ! dam
         +N+Msc+Sg:mX4 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:m   er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:m   ar-ane ;
                +N:    R      ;

LEXICON m1c ! fe, komite
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: ar-ane ;
                +N: R      ;

LEXICON m1V ! sko
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: 0-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: 0-a   ;
                +N: R     ;

LEXICON m2 ! lærer
 +N+Msc+Sg:        0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:        e-ne   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%^NYNAG 0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%^NYNAG ar-ane ;
        +N:        R      ;

LEXICON m3 ! onkel
         +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3V ! meter
 +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X1 0-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:X1 0-ane ;
        +N:   R     ;

LEXICON m1n3
  m1 ;
  n3 ;

LEXICON ma ! alliert
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-e ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: e-e ;
        +N: R   ;

LEXICON KOLLEGA
 +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X2 er-ene ; ! delete a, kolleger
 +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:   er-ene ; ! keep a, kollegaer
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON KONTO
         +N+Msc+Sg:     0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:X2i  0-ene  ; ! delete o
         +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:     er-ene ; ! Regular pl
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:     ar-ane ; ! Regular pl
                +N:     R      ;

LEXICON RADIUS
         +N+Msc+Sg:%>us 0-en   ;
     +N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>en K      ; ! short def
         +N+Msc+Pl:     er-ene ; ! Regular pl
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:     ar-ane ; ! Regular pl
                +N:     R      ;

LEXICON BROR
         +N+Msc+Sg:bror  0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:brødr e-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:brør  0-ne  ;

LEXICON BRODER
         +N+Msc+Sg:broder 0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:brødr  e-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:brør   0-ne  ;

LEXICON FAR
  +N+Msc+Sg:far  0-en  ;
  +N+Msc+Pl:fedr e-ene ;
!           +N:     R     ;

LEXICON DATTER
          +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:datter   K ;
            +N+Fem+Sg+Def:datra    K ;
            +N+Msc+Sg+Def:datteren K ;
!   +N+Fem+Sg+Def+Radical:datra    K ;
          +N+Fem+Pl+Indef:døtre    K ;
            +N+Fem+Pl+Def:døtrene  K ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Indef:dotter   K ;
    +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Def:dotra    K ;
!                      +N:         R ;

LEXICON MOR
     +N+Fem+Sg:mor   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:moren K     ;
    +N+Fem+Pl:mødr  e-ene ;

LEXICON FOT
     +N+Msc+Sg:fot   0-en   ;
    +N+Msc+Pl:føtt  e-ene ;

LEXICON ROT
     +N+Fem+Sg:rot   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:roten K     ;
    +N+Fem+Pl:røtt  er-ene ;


LEXICON GÅS
     +N+Fem+Sg:gås   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:gåsen K     ;
     +N+Fem+Pl:gjess 0-ene ;

LEXICON KU
     +N+Fem+Sg:ku   0-a    ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Def:kua K      ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def:kuen K      ;
     +N+Fem+Pl:kyr  0-a    ;
     +N+Fem+Pl+Use/NG:ku   er-ene ;

LEXICON KLE
 +N+Neu+Sg+Indef:kle    K     ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Def:kledet K     ;
       +N+Neu+Pl:klæ    r-rne ;


LEXICON MANN
  +N+Msc+Sg:mann   0-en  ;
  +N+Msc+Pl:mannZ1 0-ene ;
!        +N:   R     ;

LEXICON indeclm !mX, eigentleg.
  +N+Msc+Indcl: # ;
!           +N: R ;

! Feminines
! ---------

LEXICON fx ! Former vx, awaiting classification.
  f1 ;

LEXICON fX ! førehand
 +N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;

!LEXICON fD ! i tide
! +N+Fem+Dat: K ;


LEXICON f1-e- ! helg
 +N: Re      ;
     f1morph ;

LEXICON f1 ! myr, krone
 +N: R       ;
     f1morph ;

LEXICON f1morph
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en     ; ! myren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl: er-ene ;

LEXICON f1sg ! grisetang
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en  ; ! myren !^C^

LEXICON f1b ! skam
 +N+Fem+Sg:mX4 0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:m   en     ; ! myren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:m   er-ene ;
        +N:    R      ;

LEXICON f1X ! bok
 +N+Fem+Sg:   0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:   en     ; ! boken !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON f1V ! mus
 +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg: en    ; ! musen !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl: 0-ene ;
        +N: R     ;

LEXICON f2
  f1 ;

LEXICON f3 ! lever
 +N+Fem+Sg:X1 0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:   en     ; ! levren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:X1 er-ene ;
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON fGLO
 +N+Fem+Sg:   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg:   en    ; ! levren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:Z1 r-rne ;
        +N:   R     ;



! Neuters
! -------

LEXICON nX ! styrbord
 +N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
     +N: R ;

!LEXICON nD ! i live
! +N+Neu+Dat: K ;


!LEXICON n1-e- !
! +N: Re ;

LEXICON n1 ! hus
 +N: R       ;
     n1morph ;

LEXICON n1morph
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et    ;
! +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ene-a ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-er-ene-a ; ! tribunaler

LEXICON n1b ! rom
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m   0-ene-a ;
        +N:    R       ;

LEXICON n1sg ! yr
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON n2 ! eple, salt
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: er-ene-a ;
        +N: R        ;

LEXICON n2b ! program
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et       ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m   0-er-ene-a ;
        +N:    R          ;

LEXICON n2c ! album, kontor
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et       ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-er-ene-a ;
        +N: R          ;

LEXICON n2s ! mørke
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
        +N: R    ;
