src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3_letter
fut+CmpNP/None:fut m1-e- ; 
glo+CmpNP/None:glo fGLO ; 
klo+CmpNP/None:klo fGLO ; 
ski+CmpNP/None:ski f1V ; 
LEXICON Noun
garde mD ;
gårde mD ;
fjells nD ;
topps mD ;
stede nD ;
dage mD ;
tide fD ;
utide fD ;
helg f1-e- ;
gutt m1-e- ;
sprut m1-e- ;
stut m1-e- ;
spene f1 ;
tilleggsmelding f1 ;
sommerutstilling f1 ;
bemanning f1 ;
setting f1 ;
binnsåle m1 ;
regnskapstjeneste m1 ;
rytmikk m1 ;
livsstilssykdom m1b ;
lokkerein m1 ;
senior m1 ;
bermudashorts m4 ;
badeshorts m4 ;
skolemat m1sg ;
reisevirksomhet m1 ;
selvbilde n1 ;
forvaltningsvedtak n1 ;
kakefyll n1 ;
avsavn n1 ;
oppfølgingsverktøy n1 ;
hark m1Vn1 ;
glepp m1Vn1 ;
kipp m1Vn1 ;
pass m1Vn1 ;
hoppski f2 ;
krøtterdrift f2 ;
innskrift f2 ;
helsepersonellov f2 ;
trålerlov f2 ;
rørlegger m2 ;
humanetiker m2 ;
hoveddommer m2 ;
postsorterer m2 ;
bisitter m2 ;
utvalgsarbeid n2 ;
forsøksområde n2 ;
diskusjonsmøte n2 ;
rettsgebyr n2 ;
portrett n2 ;
gudsøster f3 ;
lillesøster f3 ;
storesøster f3 ;
stesøster f3 ;
svigersøster f3 ;
merkeregel m3 ;
plassmangel m3 ;
bilnøkkel m3 ;
studiehjemmel m3 ;
veksel m3 ;
tordivel m3 ;
crescendo m1n3 ;
dakapo n1n3 ;
kollega KOLLEGA ;
kopphåndkle:kopphånd KLE ;
silketørkle:silketør KLE ;
spelemann:spele MANN ;
sistemann:siste MANN ;
landsstyreformann:landsstyrefor MANN ;
handelsmann:handels MANN ;
kjentmann:kjent MANN ;
saueklo fGLO ;
balansekonto:balansekonto KONTO ;
konto KONTO ;
bankkonto KONTO ;
postgirokonto:postgirokonto KONTO ;
diskonto KONTO ;
oldefar:olde FAR ;
pleiefar:pleie FAR ;
skriftefar:skrifte FAR ;
bestefar:beste FAR ;
fosterfar:foster FAR ;
broder: BRODER ;
urfolksbroder:urfolks BRODER ;
guddatter:gud DATTER ;
pleiedatter:pleie DATTER ;
stedatter:ste DATTER ;
fosterdatter:foster DATTER ;
kongsdatter:kongs DATTER ;
gudmor:gud MOR ;
tippoldemor:tippolde MOR ;
stemor:ste MOR ;
farmor:far MOR ;
værmor:vær MOR ;
gudbror:gud BROR ;
lillebror:lille BROR ;
navnebror:navne BROR ;
storebror:store BROR ;
morbror:mor BROR ;
radius:radi RADIUS ;
gås: GÅS ;
canadagås:canada GÅS ;
sædgås:sæd GÅS ;
dverggås:dverg GÅS ;
grågås:grå GÅS ;
melkeku:melke KU ;
splittkeinski f1V ;
hoppski f1V ;
skuterski f1V ;
ting m1V ;
joggesko m1V ;
bremsesko m1V ;
vintersko m1V ;
sommer m3V ;
meter m3V ;
kvadratkilometer m3V ;
desiliter m3V ;
hetkoliter m3V ;
knipetang f1X ;
lydbok f1X ;
stilbok f1X ;
regnekraft f1X ;
trerot:tre ROT ;
ørerot:øre ROT ;
gulrot:gul ROT ;
kålrot:kål ROT ;
pepperrot:pepper ROT ;
stand m1X ;
bonde m1X ;
melkebonde m1X ;
skattebonde m1X ;
sauebonde m1X ;
swahili m1X ;
versefot:verse FOT ;
framfot:fram FOT ;
gipsfot:gips FOT ;
førehand fX ;
overhånd fX ;
forhånd fX ;
dagtid mX ;
fødende mX ;
snei mX ;
handfull mX ;
svartedauen mX ;
øre-nese-hals mX ;
fjærfe nX ;
gagn nX ;
ly nX ;
alliert ma ;
skam f1b ;
saltvannsdam m1b ;
assosiasjonsrikdom m1b ;
vesaldom m1b ;
spådom m1b ;
havstrøm m1b ;
kilogram n1b ;
behandlingsprogram n1b ;
tørkerom n1b ;
enrom n1b ;
bygdesentrum n1b ;
vekstpotensial n2b ;
dokumentarprogram n2b ;
endringsprogram n2b ;
kampflyprogram n2b ;
dokumentasjonsverktøy n2b ;
stamkafé m1c ;
industrikomité m1c ;
nobelkomité m1c ;
samarbeidskomité m1c ;
finanskomité m1c ;
eksekutivkomité m1c ;
rapportskjema n2c ;
advokatfirma n2c ;
problem n2c ;
byplankontor n2c ;
idrettskontor n2c ;
kvikksand f1sg ;
melk f1sg ;
helmelk f1sg ;
mjølk f1sg ;
friomsorg m1sg ;
kubansk m1sg ;
tysk m1sg ;
kreft m1sg ;
torskefiske n1sg ;
kystfiske n1sg ;
valgfusk n1sg ;
slim n1sg ;
mageondt n1sg ;
gamledager:gamledage m1pl ;
meslinger:meslinge m1pl ;
brennkopper:brennkoppe m1pl ;
juni indeclm ;
januar indeclm ;
desember indeclm ;
november indeclm ;
mars indeclm ;
fot: FOT ;
tusmørke n2s ;
fiske n2s ;
heimefiske n2s ;
vårfiske n2s ;
lykkønske n2s ;
kinin m1n1 ;
stadion m1n1 ;
legio nX ;
hestesko m1V ;
doppsko m1V ;
ørneklo fGLO ;
facto nX ;
pepp m1sg ;
philos x ;
radius x ;
flaggermus f1V ;
gikt f1sg ;
nordmøre fx ;
lausøre fx ;
artisjokkhjerte fx ;
unytte fx ;
duodji m4 ;
longs m4 ;
stillongs m4 ;
tights m4 ;
lule fx ;
dekolonisering x ;
fiber x ;
tranghet x ;
mellomfot:mellom FOT ;
fremskott x ;
pensumbok f1X ;
